Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1925
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act is to protect the public
health and the health, safety, and welfare of children who reside in or who
are placed in settings other than the home of their parent or legal guardian
by providing for the licensing of residential child-caring agencies and child-placing
agencies in the State of Nebraska. The act provides for the development, establishment,
and enforcement of basic standards for residential child-caring agencies and
child-placing agencies.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 2.